Tennessee, session 114, SB0619.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-32-105, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(g)
(1) A provider, who is licensed or registered in this state and who has
had an adverse action taken against the provider's license or registration by a
relevant board made public pursuant to this section and such action resulted in a
consent order being issued requiring completion of a peer assistance or
treatment program contract, has the right to petition the relevant board following
completion of all requirements in the peer assistance or treatment program
contract to remove information for public dissemination regarding the adverse
action and consent order after ten (10) years from the start of the probation date
indicated in the consent order.
(2) The relevant board shall review and make a determination on a
removal request submitted pursuant to subdivision (g)(1). If the relevant board
approves the request, then that board shall remove the requested information
from any place the information is made public pursuant to this section.
(3) The division of health related boards is authorized to promulgate rules
to effectuate this act. The rules must be promulgated in accordance with the
Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.
SB0619
000718
- 1 -

SECTION 2. For purposes of promulgating rules, this act takes effect upon becoming
law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, this act takes effect July 1, 2025, the
public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 000718